Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3431
Board; meetings; officers; quorum.

The board shall hold at least one regular meeting each year. Special meetings shall be held as the rules and regulations provide and at such places as the board elects. Notice of all meetings shall be given in such manner as the rules and regulations provide. The board shall elect from its members, annually at its first meeting after March 1, a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary. A quorum of the board shall consist of not less than five members.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 31.